Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1864HV (2) 91 je/jh H.F. 577 Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 39. Direct the institutions of higher 3 learning governed by the board to waive undergraduate tuition 4 and mandatory fees for a resident of Iowa who receives the 5 maximum score possible on the college readiness assessment 6 administered by ACT, inc., the college readiness assessment 7 administered by the college board, or the classic learning test 8 developed by classic learning initiatives and to provide the 9 student with a stipend of five thousand dollars per semester. 10 The board may require that documentation of the score be 11 provided in order to qualify for such a waiver and stipend. 12 A student must make satisfactory academic progress toward 13 graduation in order to continue to receive such a waiver and 14 stipend. The board may establish standards for such progress. 15